Tennessee, session 114, HB1515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-1327(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c) On or before the first Monday in September, the comptroller of the treasury
shall file with the board of equalization the assessments made by the comptroller,
together with such records as may be deemed necessary. The comptroller of the
treasury shall send notice to any person or entity filing an exception to the action taken
on the exception, and persons or entities affected by the comptroller of the treasury's
action on the exceptions may file further exceptions with the state board of equalization,
for review pursuant to § 67-5-1328. All persons or entities authorized to file an exception
under this section but failing to do so on or before twenty-five (25) days from the first
Monday in September are deemed to have waived any objection they may otherwise
have raised with regard to the assessments.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1515
011010
- 1 -